Massachusetts, session 194th, H2640.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 123 of Chapter 140 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting a new paragraph:
"Notwithstanding any general law, special law, or regulation to the contrary, firearms
furnished through the Civilian Marksmanship Program as established by the United States
Congress shall be eligible for transfer by a licensee."
of 1